Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.330

Warrants—Issuance—Priority—Acceptance.

The board may provide by resolution for the issuance of warrants in payment of the costs and expenses of any project, payable out of the county road improvement fund. The warrants shall be redeemed either in cash or by bonds for the same project authorized by the resolution.

All warrants issued against any such improvement fund shall be claims and liens against said fund prior and superior to any right, lien or claim of any surety upon the bond given to the county by or for the contract to secure the performance of his or her contract or to secure the payment of persons who have performed work thereon, furnished materials therefor, or furnished provisions and supplies for the carrying on of the work.

The county treasurer may accept warrants against any county road improvement fund upon such conditions as the board may prescribe in payment of: (1) Assessments levied to supply that fund in due order of priority; (2) judgments rendered against property owners who have become delinquent in the payment of assessments to that fund; and (3) certificates of purchase in cases where property of delinquents has been sold under execution or at tax sale for failure to pay assessments levied to supply that fund.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4147; 1980 c 100 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.330. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 33.]